src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! # Pronominien morfologia

!! Pronominit ovat edelleen vaan kokeiluvaiheessa.

LEXICON 12pronsg !!= @CODE@ on 1., 2. p. yksikkö
+Nom:ie     K ;
+Gen:inun   K ;
+Gen:un     K ; ! TODO consider
+Ill:inhuun K ;
+Par:innuu  K ;
+Ess:inuna  K ;
+Tra:inuksi K ;
+Ine:inussa K ;
+Ela:inusta K ;
+All:inule  K ;
+All:ulle   K ; ! TODO consider
+Ade:inula  K ;
+Ade:ulla   K ; ! TODO consider
+Abl:inulta K ;
+Abl:ulta   K ; ! TODO consider
+Abe:inutta K ;


LEXICON 12pronsg_short !!= @CODE@ on 1., 2. p. yksikkö
+Gen:un K ;
+Ill:inhuun K ;
+Par:innuu K ;
+Ess:inuna    K ;
+Tra:inuksi   K ;
+Ine:inussa   K ;
+Ela:inusta   K ;
+All:ulle   K ;
+Ade:ulla    K ;
+Abl:ulta   K ;
+Abe:inutta	K ;


LEXICON han_pron
+Nom: K ;
+Gen:en K ;
+Ill:heen K ;
+Par:tä K ;
+Ess:enä    K ;
+Tra:eksi   K ;
+Ine:essä   K ;
+Ela:estä   K ;
+All:ele   K ;
+All+Err/Orth:elle K ; 
+Ade:elä    K ;
+Ade+Err/Orth:ellä K ; 
+Abl:eltä   K ;
+Abe:että	K ;


LEXICON 123pronpl  !!= @CODE@
+Nom:t K ;
+Acc+Err/Orth:ät K ; !heät, meät ...
+Acc:iđät 	K ;
+Gen:iđän K ; !!đ
+Gen+Err/Orth:än K ; ! ?? meän, heän, ...
+Gen+Err/Orth:ijän K ; ! meijän, heijän ... 
+Ill:ihin K ;
+Par:itä K ;
+Ess:inä    K ;
+Tra:iksi   K ;
+Ine:issä   K ;
+Ela:istä   K ;
+All:ile   K ;
+All+Err/Orth:ille K ; 
+Ade:ilä    K ;
+Ade+Err/Orth:illä K ; 
+Abl:iltä   K ;
+Abe:ittä	K ;


LEXICON se_pron
+Nom:se K ;
+Gen:sen K ;
+Ill:siihen K ;
+Ela:siitä   K ;
+Ine:siinä K ;
+Par:sitä K ;
+Tra:siksi   K ;
+Ess:sinä   K ;
+All:sille K ;
+Ade:sillä    K ;
+Abl:siltä     K ;


LEXICON netpronpl
+Nom:et K ;
+Gen:iitten K ;
+Ill:iihin K ;
+Ela:iistä   K ;
+Ine:iissä	K ;
+Par:iitä	K ;
+Tra:iiksi	K ;
+Ess:iinä	K ;
+All:iile	K ;
+Ade:iilä	K ;
+Abl:iiltä   K ;
+Abe:iittä	K;


LEXICON tama_pron
+Sg+Nom:mä    K ;
+Sg+Gen:män   K ;
+Sg+Ill:hän   K ;
+Sg+Ess:nä    K ;
+Sg+Ela:stä   K ;
+Sg+Ine:ssä   K ;
+Sg:          pronobl_2 ;


LEXICON tuo
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Gen:n K ;
+Sg+Ill:hon K ;
+Sg+Ela:sta   K ;
+Sg+Abl:lta   K ;
+Sg: pronobl ;


LEXICON namaobl !! nuoitä
+Pl+Gen:%>tten K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>hin K ;
+Pl+Ela:%>st^A   K ;
+Pl+Abl:%>lt^A   K ;
+Pl: pronobl ;


LEXICON pronobl
+Par:%>t^A K ; !! tuotä
+Tra:%>ksi   K ;
+Ess:%>n^A    K ;
+Ine:%>ss^A K ;
+All:%>le K ;
+Ade:%>l^A    K ;


LEXICON pronobl_2
+Par:%>t^A K ;
+Tra:%>ksi   K ;
+Ess:%>n^A   K ;
+All:%>lle K ;
+Ade:%>ll^A    K ;
+Abl:%>lt^A     K ;


LEXICON relkys
+Nom:ka K ;
+Gen:nka K ;
+Ill:hon K ;
+Ill:honka K ;
+Par:ta K ;
+Ess:na    K ;
+Tra:ksi   K ;
+Ine:ssa   K ;
+Ela:sta   K ;
+All:lle   K ;
+Ade:lla    K ;
+Abl:lta   K ;


LEXICON mi_rel
+Sg+Nom:kä K ;
+Sg+Gen:nkä K ;
+Sg+Ill:hin K ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:hiin K ; ! mihiin
+Sg+Ill:hinkä K ;
+Sg+Par:tä K ;
+Sg+Par+Clt:täs K ;
+Sg+Ess:nä    K ;
+Sg+Tra:ksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:ssä   K ;
+Sg+Ela:stä   K ;
+Sg+All:lle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:llä    K ;
+Sg+Abl:ltä   K ;

+Pl+Nom:kkä K ;
+Pl+Nom:tkä K ;
+Pl+Gen:nkä K ;
+Pl+Par:tä K ;
+Pl+Ill:hin K ;
+Pl+Ill:hinkä K ;
+Pl+Ess:nä    K ;
+Pl+Tra:ksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:ssä   K ;
+Pl+Ela:stä   K ;
+Pl+All:lle   K ;
+Pl+Ade:llä    K ;
+Pl+Abl:ltä   K ;




LEXICON joi_relkyspl
+Gen:%>tten K ;
+Ill:%>hin K ;
+Par:%>ita K ;
+Ess:%>na    K ;
+Tra:%>ksi   K ;
+Ine:%>ssa   K ;
+Ela:%>sta   K ;
+All:%>le   K ;
+Ade:%>la    K ;
+Abl:%>lta   K ;

LEXICON kuka_relkys_obl
+Pl+Par:itä K ;
+Pl+Ade+Err/Orth:ilä K ; 
+Sg: kuka_relkys_sgpl ;
+Pl: kuka_relkys_sgpl ;

LEXICON kuka_relkys_sgpl
+Gen:nen   K ;
+Gen:nenkä   K ;
+Ill:nheen  K ;
+Par:tä  K ;
+Ess:nenä    K ;
+Tra:neksi    K ;
+Ine:nessä    K ;
+Ela:nestä    K ;
+All:nele   K ;
+All:lle   K ;
+Ade:nelä    K ;
+Ade:llä    K ;
+Abl:neltä    K ;
+Abl:ltä    K ;

LEXICON kumpi
+Nom:pi K ;
+Gen:man K ;
+Ill:phaan K ;
+Par:ppaa K ;
+Par:paa K ;
+Ess:pana    K ;
+Tra:maksi   K ;
+Ine:massa    K ;
+Ela:masta    K ;
+All:malle    K ;
+Ade:malla    K ;
+Abl:malta    K ;


LEXICON s1refpron
+Gen:eni K ;
+Ill:heeni K ;
+Par:eeni K ;
+Par:iäni K ;
+Par:eäni K ;
+Ess:enäni    K ;
+Tra:ekseni   K ;
+Ine:essäni   K ;
+Ela:estäni   K ;
+All:eleni   K ;
+Ade:eläni    K ;
+Abl:eltäni   K ;


LEXICON s2refpron
+Gen:sti K ;
+Ill:heesti K ;
+Par:eesti K ;
+Par:iästi K ;
+Par:eästi K ;
+Ess:enästi    K ;
+Tra:eksesti   K ;
+Ine:essästi   K ;
+Ela:estästi   K ;
+All:elesti   K ;
+Ade:elästi    K ;
+Abl:eltästi   K ;


LEXICON p1refpron
+Gen:mä K ;
+Ill:heemä K ;
+Par:eemä K ;
+Par:iämä K ;
+Par:eämä K ;
+Ess:enämmä    K ;
+Tra:eksemmä   K ;
+Ine:essämmä   K ;
+Ela:estämmä   K ;
+All:elemmä   K ;
+Ade:elämmä    K ;
+Abl:eltämmä   K ;

LEXICON p2refpron
+Gen:nä K ;
+Ill:heenä K ;
+Par:eenä K ;
+Par:iännä K ;
+Par:eännä K ;
+Ess:enännä    K ;
+Tra:eksennä   K ;
+Ine:essännä   K ;
+Ela:estännä   K ;
+All:elennä   K ;
+Ade:elännä    K ;
+Abl:etännä   K ;


LEXICON p3refpron
+Gen:nä K ;
+Ill:heensä K ;
+Par:eensä K ;
+Par:iänsä K ;
+Par:eänsä K ;
+Ess:enänsä    K ;
+Tra:eksensä   K ;
+Ine:essänsä   K ;
+Ela:estänsä   K ;
+All:elensä   K ;
+Ade:elänsä    K ;
+Abl:ltänsä   K ;


! LEXICON toinen
! +Nom: ;

LEXICON toisen
+Sg+Nom:nen     K ;
+Sg+Gen:se    n_PxK ;
+Sg+Ill:shee  n_PxK ;
+Sg+Par:sta   PxK ;
+Sg+Ess:sena   PxK ;
+Sg+Tra:seks   i_PxK ;
+Sg+Ine:sessa   PxK ;
+Sg+Ela:sesta   PxK ;
+Sg+All:sele   PxxK ;
+Sg+Ade:sela   PxK ;
+Sg+Abl:selta   PxK ;

+Pl+Nom:set     K ;
+Pl+Gen:ste    n_PxK ;
+Pl+Ill:shii  n_PxK ;
+Pl+Par:sia   PxK ;
+Pl+Ess:sina   PxK ;
+Pl+Tra:siks   i_PxK ;
+Pl+Ine:sissa   PxK ;
+Pl+Ela:sista   PxK ;
+Pl+All:sile   PxxK ;
+Pl+Ade:sila   PxK ;
+Pl+Abl:silta   PxK ;


LEXICON joku_indef
+Sg:          sgjoku_indef ;
+Pl:i         pljoku_indef ;
+Pl+Nom:kku              K ;

LEXICON sgjoku_indef
+Nom:ku K ;
+Gen:nku K ;
+Ill:honki K ;
jokuinf ;

LEXICON pljoku_indef
+Gen:ttenki K ;
+Ill:hinki K ;
jokuinf ;

LEXICON jokuinf
+Par:taki K ;
+Ess:naki    K ;
+Tra:ksiki   K ;
+Ine:ssaki   K ;
+Ela:staki   K ;
+All:lleki   K ;
+Ade:llaki    K ;
+Abl:ltaki   K ;


LEXICON muutampi_indef
+Sg+Nom:pi K ;
+Sg+Gen:an K ;
+Sg+Ill:phaan K ;
+Sg+Ill:haan K ;
+Sg+Par:ppaa K ;
+Sg+Par:aa K ;
+Sg+Ess:panna    K ;
+Sg+Ess:anna    K ;
+Sg+Tra:aksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:assa    K ;
+Sg+Ela:asta    K ;
+Sg+All:alle    K ;
+Sg+Ade:alla    K ;
+Sg+Abl:alta    K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:iitten K ;
+Pl+Ill:phiin K ;
+Pl+Ill:hiin K ;
+Pl+Par:ppii K ;
+Pl+Par:ppiita K ;
+Pl+Par:ia K ;
+Pl+Ess:pinna    K ;
+Pl+Ess:inna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi  K ;
+Pl+Ine:issa  K ;
+Pl+Ela:ista  K ;
+Pl+All:ille  K ;
+Pl+Ade:illa  K ;
+Pl+Abl:ilta  K ;
+Pl+Com:pinne K ;

LEXICON muutama_indef
+Sg+Nom:a K ;
+Sg+Gen:an K ;
+Sg+Ill:haan K ;
+Sg+Par:aa K ;
+Sg+Ess:anna    K ;
+Sg+Tra:aksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:assa    K ;
+Sg+Ela:asta    K ;
+Sg+All:alle    K ;
+Sg+Ade:alla    K ;
+Sg+Abl:alta    K ;
+Pl+Nom:at K ;
+Pl+Gen:iitten K ;
+Pl+Ill:hiin K ;
+Pl+Par:ii K ;
+Pl+Par:iita K ;
+Pl+Ess:inna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi  K ;
+Pl+Ine:issa  K ;
+Pl+Ela:ista  K ;
+Pl+All:ille  K ;
+Pl+Ade:illa  K ;
+Pl+Abl:ilta  K ;
+Pl+Com:inne K ;


LEXICON usheempi_kvant_sg
+Nom:pi K ;
+Gen:an K ;
+Ill:phaan K ;
+Par:ppaa K ;
+Ess:panna    K ;
+Tra:aksi   K ;
+Ine:assa    K ;
+Ela:asta    K ;
+All:alle    K ;
+Ade:alla    K ;
+Abl:alta    K ;

LEXICON usheempi_kvant_pl
+Nom:at K ;
+Gen:iitten K ;
+Ill:phiin K ;
+Par:ppii K ;
+Par:ppiita K ;
+Ess:pinna    K ;
+Tra:iksi  K ;
+Ine:issa  K ;
+Ela:ista  K ;
+All:ille  K ;
+Ade:illa  K ;
+Abl:ilta  K ;
+Com:pinne K ;

LEXICON usheimat_kvant_pl
+Nom:at K ;
+Gen:iitten K ;
+Ill:phiin K ;
+Par:ppii K ;
+Par:ppiita K ;
+Ess:pinna    K ;
+Tra:iksi  K ;
+Ine:issa  K ;
+Ela:ista  K ;
+All:ille  K ;
+Ade:illa  K ;
+Abl:ilta  K ;
+Com:pinne K ;



LEXICON enniin_kvant_sg
+Nom:n K ;
+Gen:män K ;
+Ill:mphään K ;
+Par:ntä K ;
+Ess:mpännä    K ;
+Tra:mäksi   K ;
+Ine:mässa    K ;
+Ela:mästa    K ;
+All:mälle    K ;
+Ade:mällä    K ;
+Abl:mältä    K ;

LEXICON enniin_kvant_pl
+Nom:mät K ;
+Gen:miitten K ;
+Ill:mphiin K ;
+Par:mppii K ;
+Par:mppiitä K ;
+Ess:mpinnä    K ;
+Tra:miksi  K ;
+Ine:missä  K ;
+Ela:mistä  K ;
+All:mille  K ;
+Ade:millä  K ;
+Abl:miltä  K ;
+Com:mpinne K ;
