src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1:m        12pronsg       ; !!= * @CODE@
mie+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Use/NG:m 12pronsg_short ; !!= * @CODE@
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2:s        12pronsg       ; !!  * ...
sie+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Use/NG:s 12pronsg_short ; !!= * @CODE@
hän+Pron+Pers+Sg3:hän      han_pron       ;
se+Pron+Pers+Sg3:          se_pron        ;
met+Pron+Pers+Pl1:me       123pronpl      ;
tet+Pron+Pers+Pl2:te       123pronpl      ;
het+Pron+Pers+Pl3:he       123pronpl      ;
net+Pron+Pers+Pl3:n        netpronpl      ; ! e>i
tämä+Pron+Dem:tä            tama_pron ;
tuo+Pron+Dem:tuo            tuo     ;
se+Pron+Dem+Sg:             se_pron ;
nämät+Pron+Dem:näi       namaobl ;
nuot+Pron+Dem:nuoi          namaobl ;
net+Pron+Dem:nii         namaobl ; ! e>i
kuka+Pron+Interr:ke             kuka_relkys_obl  ;  !!= * @CODE@
kumpi+Pron+Interr:kum kumpi ;
mikä+Pron+Interr:mi             mi_rel  ;  !!= * @CODE@
joka+Pron+Rel+Sg:jo             relkys ;
joka+Pron+Rel+Pl:joi        joi_relkyspl ;
mikä+Pron+Rel:mi             mi_rel ;
itteni+Pron+Refl+Sg:itt     s1refpron ;
ittesti+Pron+Refl+Sg:itt    s2refpron ;
ittemä+Pron+Refl+Pl:itt     p1refpron ;
ittenä+Pron+Refl+Pl:itt     p2refpron ;
ittensä+Pron+Refl+Pl:itt    p3refpron ;
toinen+Pron+Recipr:toi                  toisen ;
joku+Pron+Indef:jo                      joku_indef ;
muutampi+Pron+Indef:muutam           muutampi_indef ;
muutama+Pron+Indef:muutam            muutama_indef ;
kukanen+Pron+Qu:kuka                    toisen ;
usheempi+Pron+Qu+Sg:usheem            usheempi_kvant_sg ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
usheempi+Pron+Qu+Pl:usheem            usheempi_kvant_pl ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
usheimat+Pron+Qu+Pl:usheim            usheimat_kvant_pl ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
enniin+Pron+Qu+Sg:ennii            enniin_kvant_sg ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
enniin+Pron+Qu+Pl:ennii            enniin_kvant_pl ; !!! TODO en osaa enempää/MK
